Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.300

Proof of eligibility to vote or hold a position on the commission—Records—Inspection by commission—Confidentiality of information—Limitation of section.

(1) To prove eligibility to vote or hold a position on the commission, each producer must show records of sales of commercial quantities of wheat or barley sold within the past three years if requested by the commission.

(2) Each handler shall keep a complete and accurate record of all wheat and barley handled.

(3) Handlers' records must be in the form and contain the information as the commission may by rule prescribe, must be preserved for a period of three years, and are subject to inspection at any time upon demand of the commission or its agents.

(4) The commission through its agents may enter and inspect the premises and records of any handler of wheat or barley for the purpose of enforcing this chapter. The commission has the authority to issue subpoenas for the production of books, records, documents, and other writings of any kind from any handler and from any person having, either directly or indirectly, actual or legal control of or over the premises, books, records, documents, or other writings, for the purpose of enforcing this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter.

(5) All information furnished to or acquired by the commission or by an agent of the commission under this section must be kept confidential by all officers, employees, and agents of the commission, except as may be necessary in a suit or other legal proceeding brought by, on behalf of, or against the commission or its employees or agents involving the enforcement of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter.

(6) This section does not prohibit:

(a) The issuance of general statements based upon the reports of a number of persons subject to this chapter, which statements do not identify the information furnished by any person; or

(b) The publication by the commission or the director of the name of any person violating this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, together with a statement of the particular provisions and the manner of the violation.

[ 2009 c 33 s 31.]